Utah statutes.
53B-21-101.   Financing of projects or buildings -- Issuance of bonds --
Sale price determined by board -- Payment of bonds -- Bonds exempt from income
taxation.
(1)  In order to pay all or part of the cost of the acquisition, purchase,
construction, improvement, remodeling, addition to, extension, equipment, and
furnishing of any project or building, including the acquisition of all
necessary land, the board, on behalf of the institution for which this is to
be done, may do the following: (a) borrow money on the credit of the income
and revenues to be derived from the operation of the building, the imposition
of student building fees, land grant interest, and net profits from
proprietary activities, or from sources other than by appropriations by the
Legislature to issuing institutions and, in anticipation of the collection of
this income and revenues, issue negotiable bonds of the institution in an
amount as the board determines is necessary for these purposes; and (b)
provide for the payment of these bonds and the rights of their holders as
provided in this chapter.
(2)  Bonds may: (a) be issued in one or more series; (b) bear any date or
dates; (c) mature at any time or times not exceeding 40 years from their date;
(d) be in any denominations; (e) be in any form, either coupon or registered;
(f) carry registration and conversion privileges; (g) be executed in any
manner; (h) be payable in any medium of payment at any place; (i) be subject
to any terms of redemption with or without premium; and (j) bear interest at
any rate or rates as provided by resolution adopted by the board at or prior
to the sale of the bonds.
(3)  The bonds may be sold in a manner, at the lowest obtainable rate or rates
of interest, and at a price or prices as determined by the board. These
determinations are conclusive.
(4)  The board may authorize one issue of bonds for the acquisition, purchase,
construction, improvement, remodeling, adding to, extending, furnishing, or
equipping of more than one building, including the acquisition of all
necessary land, and may make the bonds payable from the combined revenues of
all the buildings as well as from student building fees, land grant interest,
net profits from proprietary activities, and from sources other than those
derived from appropriations from the Legislature.
(5)  The bonds issued under this chapter have all of the qualities and
incidents of negotiable paper and are not subject to state or local income
taxation.
